Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-550
Cash deposits with State Treasurer; execution; not subject to attachment.

Such deposit shall be held by the State Treasurer to satisfy, in accordance with the provisions of sections 60-501 to 60-569, any execution on a judgment issued against such person making the deposit, for damages, including damages for care and loss of services, because of bodily injury to or death of any person, or for damages because of injury to or destruction of property, including the loss of use thereof, resulting from the ownership, maintenance, use or operation of a motor vehicle after such deposit was made. Money or securities so deposited shall not be subject to attachment or execution unless such attachment or execution shall arise out of a suit for damages as aforesaid.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 50, p. 499.